California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(C) Two members who have a minimum of five years of training and experience in the field of resource management shall be appointed by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. One member shall additionally have expertise in climate change adaptation and climate change impacts in the agricultural sector.

(2) The secretary may also appoint, in
 consultation with the panel, ex officio nonvoting members to the panel.

(c) The panel may establish ad hoc committees, which may include professionals, scientists, or representatives of nongovernmental entities, to assist it in performing its functions.

(d) The State Air Resources Board shall consult with the secretary and the panel, as appropriate, in developing the quantification methods described in subdivision (b) of Section 16428.9 of the Government Code as it relates to the demonstration and quantification of on-farm greenhouse gas emissions reductions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 283, Sec. 3.   (AB 947)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

569.

(a) (1) The department, in consultation with the panel, shall establish and oversee a Healthy Soils Program. The program shall seek to optimize climate benefits while supporting the economic viability of California agriculture by providing incentives, including, but not limited to, loans, grants, research, and technical assistance, and educational materials and outreach, to farmers whose management practices contribute to healthy soils and result in net long-term on-farm greenhouse gas benefits. The program may also include the funding of on-farm demonstration projects that further the goals of the program.

(2) The department, in consultation with the panel, may determine priorities for the program and give priority to projects that occur in and
 benefit disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, show promise of being replicable in other parts of the state, or provide environmental and agronomic cobenefits, such as improved air and water quality, improved crop yield, and reduced soil erosion.

(3) The panel shall also advise the department on scientific findings, program framework, guidelines, grower incentives, and providing technical assistance.

(4) If the department elects to fund on-farm demonstration projects described in paragraph (1), the department, in consultation with the panel, shall establish a technical advisory committee to review on-farm demonstration project applications for scientific validity and the proposed project’s potential to achieve greenhouse gas benefits.

(b) The department shall
 implement the program and quantify greenhouse gas emissions reductions in accordance with the funding guidelines developed by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 39715 of the Health and Safety Code and the quantification methods developed by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 16428.9 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) The department may pursue public and private sources to support the Healthy Soils Program.

(2) To the extent funds are available, the department may provide support to the program, including, but not limited to, technical assistance, education, and outreach.

(d) For purposes of this section, “panel” means the Scientific Advisory Panel on Resilient and Sustainable Agriculture.

(e) For purposes
 of the Healthy Soils Program, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Greenhouse gas benefits” means greenhouse gas emissions source reduction or carbon sequestration.

(2) “Healthy soils” means soils that enhance their continuing capacity to function as a biological system, increase soil organic matter, improve soil structure and water- and nutrient-holding capacity, and result in net long-term greenhouse gas benefits.

(3) “On-farm demonstration projects” means projects that incorporate farm management practices that result in greenhouse gas benefits and have outreach goals, research goals, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 283, Sec. 4.   (AB 947)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

569.5.

(a) There is hereby created the Climate Smart Agriculture Account in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, which shall consist of moneys made available from federal, state, industry, philanthropic, and private sources.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Climate Smart Agriculture Account is hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years to the department to carry out the purposes of this article.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the Climate Smart Agriculture Account for cash flow loans to the
 General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. Any such loan shall be exempt from paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16310 of the Government Code. Interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund and shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the account. This subdivision shall not authorize any transfer that would interfere with the carrying out of the object for which the account was created.

(d) (1) For any fiscal year in which moneys are received into or expended from the Climate Smart Agriculture Account, the department, no later than January 10 following the close of the fiscal year, shall submit to the Legislature an overview of the account’s income and expenditures.

(2) An overview to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 10.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

570.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Programs” means the Healthy Soils Program established pursuant to Section 569, the Alternative Manure Management Program, and the State Water Efficiency and Enhancement Program established by the department from moneys made available pursuant to Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2014.

(2) “Technical assistance” means outreach, education, training, conservation, agricultural planning, project planning, project design, grant application assistance, grant writing, matching funds coordination, translation and interpretation, project implementation support, facilitating environmental compliance, grant management assistance, project completion
 verification, outcome monitoring, case study development, and project reporting assistance provided to a farmer or rancher to improve their successful participation in the programs.

(3) “Technical assistance providers” means nonprofit organizations, groundwater sustainability agencies, irrigation districts, resource conservation districts, the University of California Cooperative Extension, and California public colleges and universities with demonstrated technical expertise in designing and implementing agricultural management practices to achieve the purposes identified in subdivision (b).

(b) The secretary shall make available not less than 5 percent of the funds appropriated to the department for the programs, but not more than 20 percent, for technical assistance directly through a technical assistance grant program, or indirectly through a block grant program that includes
 funding for technical assistance. The department shall award funds to technical assistance providers for the following purposes:

(1) To support farmers and ranchers in the application process for grants from the programs and implementation of funded projects, prioritizing that technical assistance to farms and ranches that are 500 acres or fewer. Technical assistance funding may be used to provide assistance over multiple incentive funding cycles.

(2) To provide general planning and training for climate-smart and sustainable agriculture, defined as agricultural practices that support reducing greenhouse gas emissions, sequestering carbon, conserving water and other resources, managing nutrients and pests, and supporting biodiversity. 

(3) To lease, purchase, or repair farming, ranching, and food processing equipment
 that can be centrally housed with the technical assistance provider and shared regionally with producers.

(c) The department may establish criteria and guidelines for technical assistance providers to qualify to receive funds pursuant to subdivision (b) to provide technical assistance. The department shall coordinate grant program outreach with the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture. The department shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish a process for technical assistance providers to apply to the department to receive funds to provide technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (b). Funding applications shall include, at minimum, a work plan that identifies which of the purposes identified in subdivision (b) will be targeted by the technical assistance provider, specific activities that will be undertaken to maximize farmer
 and rancher participation and project success, an estimate of the number of farmers and ranchers to be served by the technical assistance provider, and evidence of qualifications of its relevant staff and project partners. Technical assistance providers must demonstrate expertise in working with California farmers and ranchers on projects relevant to one or more of the purposes identified in subdivision (b).

(2) Ensure at least 25 percent of the awarded funds are used to provide technical assistance to socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers, as defined in Section 512.

(3) Review direct and block grant applications for technical assistance funds and recommend grant awardees to the secretary.

(4) Allow direct project costs and a percentage of overhead expenses, to be determined by the secretary, to be funded as
 part of the grant awards.

(5) Allow a percentage of funding, to be determined by the secretary, to support training and capacity building within technical assistance provider organizations and coordination between organizations to improve assistance. This shall include staff onboarding, training, and continuing education in climate-smart and conservation agricultural practices and planning.

(6) Support information sharing among technical assistance providers, the department, and other relevant stakeholders for the continuous improvement of programmatic guidelines, application processes, and relevant climate change and agricultural research.

(7) Allow equipment sharing costs funded as part of grant awards to include developing and expanding equipment sharing programs, including, but not limited to, the purchase and
 repair of tools, equipment, training, and outreach costs associated with the shared equipment within the grant term. 

(8) Consult with the Scientific Advisory Panel on Resilient and Sustainable Agriculture on grant program design, guidelines, and outreach for the technical assistance to improve coordination and information sharing on technical assistance strategies and activities for the department’s programs.

(d) The secretary shall award funds to technical assistance providers of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per solicitation, per program served. A block grant applicant or technical assistance provider that demonstrates on its application that the majority of the persons it provides technical assistance to are socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers shall receive priority consideration for funding to cover translation services, the production of outreach
 materials, and additional outreach-related expenses.

(e) In administering this section, the department may recover reasonable costs from the funds appropriated for purposes of this section for administrative activities, including, but not limited to, providing staff resources for outreach, development and administration of grant solicitations, grant management, project verification, staff training, program evaluation, and other activities as required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 283, Sec. 5.   (AB 947)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. University of California Center for Pest Research [576. - 585.]

576.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the University of California Pest Research Act of 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

577.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) There is a need to develop and apply ecologically based pest management alternatives that are environmentally sound to prevent, control, and eradicate pests.

(b) The continuation of pest control technology in agriculture which relies primarily on synthetic chemicals may be impractical, given the dwindling number of newly registered chemicals, increasing resistance of numerous pests to pesticides, public concern about pesticide residues, and potential threats posed to environmental quality and human health.

(c) To be adequately prepared for existing and new infestations of agricultural pests, California needs to have a means of coordinating and evaluating long-term basic and applied pest research, including the impact of prevention, control, and eradication efforts upon public health and the environment.

(d) The state should facilitate, promote, and support collaborative pest research programs and projects by its agencies, public and private universities, the federal government, and the agricultural industry that work toward developing environmentally sound, ecologically based pest management techniques.

(e) In order to strengthen pest prevention, control, and eradication efforts, it is the intent of the Legislature that an administrative structure be created within the University of California which, in cooperation with California’s public and private universities, the state, the agricultural industry, and persons experienced with environmentally sound, ecologically based pest management alternatives, advances pest research and formulates innovative solutions that better safeguard the environment and public health.

Toward these ends, the Legislature requests that the Regents of the University of California establish a pest research center which will review and prioritize pest-related research activities conducted through the university. It is the intent of the Legislature that University of California programs engaged in pest research shall, when applicable, follow the research priorities established by the center. The center is encouraged to develop research priorities in cooperation with other public and private universities and with state, federal, and county agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Food and Agriculture, State Department of Health Services, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, county agricultural commissioners, United States Department of Agriculture, National Science Foundation, National Institutes of Health, and the agricultural industry, and with environmental and public and occupational health groups.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

578.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section govern the construction of this article.

(a) “Center” means the University of California Center for Pest Research.

(b) “Pest” means any of the following pests that are, or are likely to become, dangerous or detrimental to the agricultural or nonagricultural environment of the state.

(1) Any insect, nematode, or weed.

(2) Any form of terrestrial, aquatic, or aerial plant, virus, fungus, bacteria, or other microorganism, except viruses, fungi, bacteria, or other microorganisms on, or in, a living human or any other living animal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

579.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the responsibilities of the center include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Establishing multidisciplinary, long-term research priorities for the University of California which focus on the application of ecologically based, environmentally sound prevention, control, and eradication practices against pests which pose a significant threat to the welfare of California’s agricultural, forest, or urban settings.

(b) Recommending how pest research funds obtained by the center on or after January 1, 1991, should be allocated within the University of California.

(c) Encouraging the use of biological controls, integrated pest management, sustainable agriculture, and other alternative pest management methods to combat pests, and, thereby, reducing exposure to toxic substances in air, water, and soil.

(d) Supporting basic and applied pest research, including practical field trials and awarding competitive grants, when economically feasible, and other projects administered by the center.

(e) Developing information systems that enable academics, farmers, and public policymakers to quickly analyze and apply pest research data.

(f) Providing information and advice to the department, county agricultural commissioners, the agricultural community, and other interested parties concerning pest prevention and detection through outreach consultation, information dissemination, education services, demonstrations, seminars, and publications.

(g) Printing and distributing information related to center-sponsored and other University of California pest management research projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

580.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the center, through its director, develop a list of recommended pest management research priorities for the University of California that emphasize and encourage the development and implementation of biological controls, sustainable agriculture, integrated pest management strategies, agroecology, cultural and mechanical practices, and other alternative pest management methods and programs which are ecologically based and environmentally sound.

(b) In developing pest management research recommendations, the center is encouraged to give high priority to alternative practices and strategies that address the reduction, control, or eradication of pests, including exotic pests, which represent the greatest threat to public health and safety or the economy of the state.

(c) In developing recommended exotic pest research priorities, the center is encouraged to give high priority to all of the following:

(1) Development of methods to determine the origin of exotic pests.

(2) Determination of the age and origin of exotic pests.

(3) Geographic analysis of exotic pests to determine place of origin, including acoustical fingerprinting.

(4) Improvements to existing exotic pest insect baits.

(5) An examination of the manner in which the sterile insect technique actually works and improvements in sterile insect technology.

(6) Assessments of wild exotic pest populations, and their regulating biological agents.

(7) Studies of exotic pests and their natural enemies in climates similar to that of the various regions in California.

(8) The exploration and introduction of natural enemies, including those from foreign countries, if necessary.

(9) Computerization of all records of exotic pest captures.

(10) Improvements in detection technology, which include better attractants. 

(11) Compilation, maintenance, and updated data about exotic pest research and exotic pest management programs operating within and outside the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

581.

To the extent that it is economically and scientifically feasible, it is the intent of the Legislature that the center shall award pest research funds obtained by the center on or after January 1, 1991, based upon a competitive application process and peer review. The center is encouraged to give high priority to exotic pest research proposals.

In awarding pest research funds, the center shall give priority to proposals that support pest control methods which use ecologically based and environmentally sound alternatives to pesticides and other chemicals, and eliminate or reduce pesticide use or eliminate or minimize pesticide residues, protect the public health and environment, and satisfy a majority of the following criteria:

(a) Are cost-effective.

(b) Improve the agricultural industry and the state economy.

(c) Do not significantly or extensively duplicate other research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

582.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California appoint a director of the center who is knowledgeable about pest management practices and research and alternative pest management techniques.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

583.

(a) The University of California shall prepare an annual report describing the activities of the center, major objectives and significant accomplishments of pest management research and extension programs at the University of California, and obstacles and opportunities toward developing and implementing pest management alternatives in the state. The report shall also include all of the following:

(1) Identification and evaluation of major policy issues and needs in pest management research in California.

(2) Identification of the long-range and short-term management research priorities established by the center.

(3) Identification of environmentally sound, ecologically based alternatives to pesticides that are possible or probable human carcinogens or reproductive toxicants.

(4) A summary and status information on all research proposals submitted through the center. The summary shall include both proposed and approved research projects.

(b) The report shall be submitted to the Legislature not later than October 15 of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

584.

If the center is established by the Regents of the University of California, it is the intent of the Legislature that the administrative costs of establishing the center shall be supported from existing resources of the university.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

585.

This article shall apply to the University of California only to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, make any of these provisions applicable to the university.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1642, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Coexistence Working Groups [587. - 588.]

587.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) The Legislature supports the agricultural community’s efforts to promote choices of farming methods, practices, and crops.

(b) The Legislature also recognizes the economic and other value to the State of California in diversified agricultural industries, bolstered by mutually supportive coexistence within and among its sectors; and further appreciates the value and importance of agricultural research for the benefit not only of California’s farming community, but also farmers and people around the world.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 324, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

588.

(a) When conflicts arise between sectors of agriculture, the secretary may designate agricultural coexistence working groups to work towards conflict resolution.

(b) The members of a coexistence working group shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the secretary. Each working group shall be comprised of no more than 10 members of diverse qualifications, who shall serve without compensation and within existing departmental resources, to develop, review, and provide findings and recommendations to the secretary regarding specific issues pertaining to the coexistence of various sectors of agricultural production that present or might present conflicts with one another. Each working group shall be comprised primarily of affected growers or their representatives from a cross section of the interested stakeholders and may also include representatives of related industries, academia, or relevant governmental agencies.

(c) In developing its findings and recommendations for the secretary, a working group may do any of the following:

(1) Recognize the economic, human, and environmental benefits of coexistence among diversified agricultural industries by developing best management practices designed to foster coexistence between the various segments of food, fiber, and agriculturally derived energy production.

(2) Identify a means of maximizing coordination and communication among those involved in sectors of agricultural production that are in real, potential, or perceived conflict with one another, and consider issues relevant to coexistence, including, but not limited to, developing consensus on voluntary production practices and protections.

(3) Work in concert with the State Board of Food and Agriculture, and provide a forum for fostering a broad-based dialogue on agricultural production practices related to coexistence, founded on facts and demonstrable applied and practical science. If data is lacking, the working group may also propose research programs to provide information on which to base further recommendations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 324, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Farm to Community Food Hub Program [590. - 593.]

590.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Beginning,” in reference to a farmer or rancher, means a person who has materially and substantially participated in the operation of a farm or ranch for 10 years or less.

(b) “Limited resource” has the same definition as in Section 760.107 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Office” means the Office of Farm to Fork in the department.

(d) “Program” means the Farm to Community Food Hub Program.

(e) “Socially disadvantaged” has
 the same definition as in Section 512.

(f) “Sustainable agriculture production practices or methods” means practices, including, but not limited to, organic methods, biological control, and integrated pest management, and ecologically beneficial means of soil improvement, irrigation, cultivation, harvesting, transportation, and marketing for California agriculture based on methods, as identified by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 608, Sec. 1.   (AB 1009)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 593.)
-------------------------------------------

591.

(a) The Farm to Community Food Hub Program is hereby established for the purpose of piloting investments in the capital aggregation and distribution infrastructure needed to increase purchasing of local, environmentally sustainable, climate-smart, and equitably produced food by schools and other institutions, build a better food system economy, support the local farming economy, accelerate climate adaptation and resilience, and employ food system workers with fair wages and working conditions.

(b) The program shall be administered by the Office of Farm to Fork in the department. In administering the program, the office shall develop and consult with a working group comprising at least seven individuals who possess expertise in the operation of food hubs and the areas
 described in subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, representatives of the Sustainable Agriculture and Research Education Program, housed within the University of California Agriculture and Natural Resources, representatives of the department’s BIPOC Producer Advisory Committee and Small-Scale Producer Advisory Committee, technical experts with experience establishing a food hub, food supply chain representatives such as producers, processors, or purchasers with expertise working with small and socially disadvantaged farms, and at least one representative with expertise in advancing food system improvements that are supportive of local food systems.

 (c) (1) A participant of the working group shall recuse themself from any matter involving the scoring of grant applications or directing of grant funds, if an entity for which they serve on the board of directors or in any other role intends to apply, or has applied,
 for a grant under the program.

(2) A participant of the working group who recuses themself pursuant to paragraph (1) may still serve on the working group to provide general guidance on the formation of the program.

(d) Participants of the working group shall receive a reasonable per diem allowance.

(e) The working group is not subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 917, Sec. 1.   (SB 1448)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 593.)
-------------------------------------------

592.

(a) The program shall incentivize the creation and permanency of public-serving aggregation and distribution enterprises, known as farm to community food hubs, which may be operated by a nonprofit organization, school district, county office of education, cooperative, food and agriculture-related business, or Certified B Corporation. A farm to community food hub shall do all of the following:

(1) Serve as an aggregator and supply chain intermediary for local or regional farms or ranches, particularly those optimizing sustainable agriculture production practices or methods and following state labor practices. The farm to community food hub shall prioritize, to the greatest extent possible, but is not limited to, serving farms or ranches that are 500 acres or less,
 cooperatively owned, or owned by farmers or ranchers who are socially disadvantaged, beginning, limited resource, veterans, or disabled.

(2) Prioritize, to the greatest extent feasible, distributing food products from the farms or ranches described in paragraph (1) to public institutions and nonprofit organizations, with primary emphasis on public schools and food banks in the region. Distribution of the food products may be contracted to a value-added intermediary, such as a produce, grain, meat, or seafood processor, if the food products are ultimately provided on a prioritized basis to public institutions or nonprofit organizations.

(3) Ensure that the farms and ranches with which it works comply with all laws, rules, and regulations, including labor and environmental requirements and standards.

(b) The program
 shall prioritize the creation of new farm to community food hubs and may be administered in two phases, as follows:

(1) During the first phase of the program, the office shall solicit and select proposals throughout the state to create farm to community food hubs that meet the requirements in subdivision (a), and award planning grants to selected proposals.

(2) During the second phase of the program, the office shall select at least three of the proposals awarded planning grants pursuant to paragraph (1) and award to those proposals development grants for capital and operating expenses of each farm to community food hub for a five-year period.

(c) As a condition of the receipt of funds pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), a farm to community food hub shall report to the office every quarter for five years
 after the receipt of the funds regarding the use of the funds.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, for at least five years following the initial award of development grant funding pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the office shall provide an annual report on the status of the farm to community food hubs to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The report shall include information on the progress of the farm to community food hubs in all of the following areas:

(1) Financial viability of self-sustainability.

(2) The number and type, with respect to size and ownership, of farms from which food products were sourced, and the volumes of food products sourced from each farm.

(3) The
 number and type of institutions served by farm to community food hubs, and the volumes of food products provided to each institution.

(e) The program or a farm to community food hub awarded a development grant pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) may accept federal, state, industry, philanthropic, and private sources of funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 917, Sec. 2.   (SB 1448)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 593.)
-------------------------------------------

593.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2034, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 594 by Stats. 2024, Ch. 917, Sec. 4.   (SB 1448)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 10, commencing with Section 590.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Buildings of the Department of Food and Agriculture [601. - 655.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [601. - 604.]

601.

The department may, with the approval of the Department of General Services, purchase or otherwise acquire real property. It may construct and equip buildings upon the property and make improvements to the property, buildings, and equipment.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 602 by Stats. 2022, Ch. 198, Sec. 3.   (SB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

603.

Any building or improvement that is constructed by the department pursuant to this chapter shall be primarily for the occupancy of the department and its commissions, divisions, bureaus, advisory boards, and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 198, Sec. 4.   (SB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

604.

The building or improvement shall be administered and supervised by the department in accordance with rules and regulations which are established by the department and approved by the Department of General Services. Such rules and regulations shall be comparable to those for the administration and supervision of other state-owned buildings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Department of Agriculture Building Fund [621. - 627.]

621.

The Department of Agriculture Building Fund is continued in existence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

622.

(a) When there are moneys appropriated to the department, excluding General Fund appropriations, that are not required to meet any demand that has accrued or may accrue against the moneys, the Controller, upon the order of the secretary, shall transfer the sum as may be designated by the secretary in the order to the Department of Agriculture Building Fund.

(b) The Controller shall not transfer an amount pursuant to subdivision (a) that exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) unless the Director of Finance concurs in the transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 198, Sec. 5.   (SB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

623.

All rentals which are collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Department of Agriculture Building Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

624.

The moneys in the Department of Agriculture Building Fund are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, to carry out this chapter, including the costs of improvements, modifications, maintenance, repairs, and other reasonable and necessary expenses of the property and the buildings or improvements under the control of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 198, Sec. 6.   (SB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

626.

Money shall not be transferred pursuant to Section 622 to the Department of Agriculture Building Fund if it will interfere with the administrative purposes for which the money was collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 198, Sec. 8.   (SB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

627.

(a) The secretary may do any and all things that are necessary to protect the investment or use, including the purchase of insurance against the loss of, or damage to, the property, or the loss of its use and occupancy, of any property and buildings and appurtenant facilities under the control of the department.

(b) Any transaction that is entered into by the secretary pursuant to this section is subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 198, Sec. 9.   (SB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Leases and Rentals [651. - 655.]

651.

Any building or improvement that is controlled by the department may contain space in excess of the requirements of the department. Until needed, the excess space may be leased or let by the department at such rental and upon such terms and conditions as are approved by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 198, Sec. 11.   (SB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

653.

The department may contract with the Department of General Services to handle the rentals of any space over and above that which is required for the department and to furnish general supervision and maintenance in any building or improvement that is controlled by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 198, Sec. 13.   (SB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

654.

The secretary may allocate space to the commissions, divisions, bureaus, advisory boards, and services that comprise the department or agencies that are subject to its jurisdiction in any building controlled by the department. The secretary may charge a rental for the space.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 198, Sec. 14.   (SB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

655.

The occupancy of any space that is not required by the department for the commissions, divisions, bureaus, advisory boards, and services specified in Section 654 shall be confined to that of other functions of the department, of other state agencies, of official agencies cooperating with the department under agreement, or of official agricultural agencies of the state or county. Rentals comparable to the rentals that are authorized by Section 654 shall be charged for the space.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 198, Sec. 15.   (SB 1499)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Foreign Trade Practices [701. - 705.]

701.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:
